nb: Balltype for baseball/softball: Baseball; Softball; Annet
sk-SK: Typ bejzbalovej/softbalovej lopty: Bejzbal; Softbal; Iné
fr: Type de balle de baseball/softball: Base-ball; Softball; Autre
de: Typ des Baseball-/Softball-Balls: Baseball; Softball; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 棒球/垒球球型: 棒球; 垒球; 其他
it: Tipo di palla da baseball/softball: Baseball; Softball; Altro
pl: Typ piłki baseballowej/softballowej: Baseball; Softball; Inne
zh-TW: 棒球/壘球球型: 棒球; 壘球; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta žoge za bejzbol/softball: Bejzbol; Softball; Drugo
bg-BG: Тип топка за бейзбол/софтбол: Бейзбол; Софтбол; Други
cs: Typ míče na baseball/softball: Baseball; Softball; Jiné
da: Baseball/softball-type: Baseball; Softball; Andet
el: Τύπος μπάλας για μπέιζμπολ/σόφτμπολ: Μπέιζμπολ; Σόφτμπολ; Άλλο
pt-PT: Tipo de bola de basebol/softbol: Basebol; Softbol; Outro
en: Baseball/Softball ball type: Baseball; Softball; Other
lt-LT: Beisbolo / softbolo kamuoliuko tipas: Beisbolas; Softbolas; Kita
ja: 野球/ソフトボール用ボールの種類: 野球; ソフトボール; その他
ko: 야구/소프트볼 유형: 야구; 소프트볼; 기타
ru: Тип мяча для бейсбола или софтбола: Бейсбол; Софтбол; Другое
hu: Baseball-/Softball-labda típusa: Baseball; Softball; Egyéb
ro-RO: Tip minge de baseball/softball: Baseball; Softball; Altele
hr-HR: Tip lopte za bejzbol/softball: Bejzbol; Softbol; Ostalo
nl: Type bal honkbal/softbal: Baseball; Softbal; Andere
fi: Baseball-/softball-pallotyyppi: Pesäpallo; Softball; Muu
pt-BR: Tipo de bola de beisebol/softball: Beisebol; Softbol; Outro
es: Tipo de pelota de béisbol/sóftbol: Béisbol; Sóftbol; Otros
th: ประเภทลูกบอลสำหรับเบสบอลและซอฟท์บอล: เบสบอล; ซอฟท์บอล; อื่นๆ
tr: Beyzbol/Softbol topu tipi: Beyzbol; Softbol; Diğer
vi: Loại bóng chày/bóng mềm: Bóng chày; Bóng mềm; Khác
sv: Typ av baseball och softball: Baseboll; Softboll; Övrigt